Tennessee, session 114, SB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-212(d), is amended by
deleting "Class E felony" and substituting "Class D felony".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(g)(2), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(Q) Aggravated cruelty to animals, as defined in § 39-14-212.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(g)(1), is amended by
deleting "(g)(2)(C)-(P)" wherever it appears and substituting "(g)(2)(C)-(Q)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(g)(4)(B), is amended by
deleting "Class B felony" and substituting "Class B felony or Class D felony".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
SB1475
008374
- 1 -